Maryland, session 2025, HB0843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 50 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 50. MOTOR VEHICLE REPAIR.
14–5001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DEALER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–111 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(C) “FRANCHISE AGREEMENT” MEANS AN ORAL OR WRITTEN
ARRANGEMENT IN WHICH:
(1) A MANUFACTURER GRANTS A LICENSE TO A DEALER TO USE A
TRADE NAME, SERVICE MARK, OR RELATED CHARACTERISTIC; AND
(2) THERE IS A COMMUNITY OF INTEREST IN THE MARKETING OF NEW
MOTOR VEHICLES OR RELATED SERVICES AT WHOLESALE, RETAIL, LEASING, OR
OTHERWISE.
(D) “HEAVY–DUTY VEHICLE” MEANS A VEHICLE HAVING A GROSS VEHICLE
WEIGHT RATING OF MORE THAN 14,000 POUNDS.
(E) “IMMOBILIZER SYSTEM” MEANS AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE DESIGNED
FOR THE SOLE PURPOSE OF PREVENTING THE THEFT OF A MOTOR VEHICLE BY
PREVENTING THE MOTOR VEHICLE IN WHICH IT IS INSTALLED FROM STARTING
WITHOUT THE CORRECT ACTIVATION OR AUTHORIZATION CODE.

HOUSE BILL 843 3
(F) (1) “INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY” MEANS A PERSON THAT IS NOT
AFFILIATED WITH A MANUFACTURER OR A MANUFACTURER’S AUTHORIZED DEALER
THAT DIAGNOSES, SERVICES, MAINTAINS, OR REPAIRS MOTOR VEHICLES OR MOTOR
VEHICLE ENGINES.
(2) “INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY” INCLUDES A DEALER WHEN
THE DEALER DIAGNOSES, SERVICES, MAINTAINS, OR REPAIRS MOTOR VEHICLES OR
MOTOR VEHICLE ENGINES THAT ARE NOT AFFILIATED WITH THE DEALER’S
FRANCHISE MANUFACTURER.
(G) “MANUFACTURER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–132 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(H) “MOTOR VEHICLE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–135 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(I) “OWNER” MEANS A PERSON THAT OWNS OR LEASES A MOTOR VEHICLE
REGISTERED IN THE STATE.
(J) (1) “TELEMATICS INFORMATION” MEANS INFORMATION GENERATED
AND COLLECTED BY THE OPERATION OF THE VEHICLE AND TRANSMITTED BY USING
WIRELESS COMMUNICATIONS TO A REMOTE RECEIVING POINT WHERE THE
INFORMATION IS STORED.
(2) “TELEMATICS INFORMATION” INCLUDES:
(I) REMOTE DIAGNOSTICS INFORMATION;
(II) AUTOMATIC AIRBAG DEPLOYMENT AND CRASH
NOTIFICATIONS;
(III) STOLEN VEHICLE LOCATIONS;
(IV) NAVIGATION INFORMATION;
(V) REMOTE DOOR UNLOCK;
(VI) TRANSMISSION OF EMERGENCY AND VEHICLE LOCATION
INFORMATION TO PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING POINTS; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER SERVICE INTEGRATING VEHICLE LOCATION
TECHNOLOGY AND WIRELESS COMMUNICATIONS.

HOUSE BILL 843
(K) “TELEMATICS SYSTEM” MEANS A TELEMATICS SERVICE OR OTHER
REMOTE OR INFORMATION SERVICE DELIVERED TO OR DERIVED FROM A MOTOR
VEHICLE BY WIRELESS COMMUNICATIONS.
(L) “TRADE SECRET” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–1201 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
14–5002.
FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, WHEN DECIDING WHETHER AN OFFER TO
PURCHASE INFORMATION OR TOOLS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IS GIVEN ON “FAIR AND
REASONABLE TERMS”, CONSIDERATION MAY BE GIVEN TO THE FOLLOWING
FACTORS:
(1) THE NET COST TO A MANUFACTURER–FRANCHISED DEALERSHIP
FOR SIMILAR INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM MANUFACTURERS, MINUS ANY
DISCOUNTS, REBATES, OR OTHER INCENTIVE PROGRAMS;
(2) THE COST TO A MANUFACTURER FOR PREPARING AND
DISTRIBUTING THE INFORMATION;
(3) THE PRICE CHARGED BY OTHER MANUFACTURERS FOR SIMILAR
INFORMATION;
(4) THE ABILITY OF AFTERMARKET TECHNICIANS TO AFFORD THE
INFORMATION;
(5) THE MEANS BY WHICH THE INFORMATION IS DISTRIBUTED;
(6) THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE INFORMATION IS USED, INCLUDING
THE NUMBER OF USERS AND THE FREQUENCY, DURATION, AND VOLUME OF USE;
AND
(7) INFLATION.
14–5003.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A
MANUFACTURER TO DIVULGE A TRADE SECRET.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A
MANUFACTURER OR DEALER TO PROVIDE AN OWNER OR INDEPENDENT REPAIR

HOUSE BILL 843 5
FACILITY ACCESS TO NONDIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR INFORMATION PROVIDED TO A
MANUFACTURER OR DEALER IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF A FRANCHISE
AGREEMENT.
(C) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THIS
SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO ABROGATE, INTERFERE WITH, CONTRADICT,
OR ALTER THE TERMS OF A FRANCHISE AGREEMENT BETWEEN A DEALER AND A
MANUFACTURER, INCLUDING THE PERFORMANCE OF WARRANTY OR RECALL
REPAIR WORK BY A DEALER ON BEHALF OF A MANUFACTURER IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE FRANCHISE AGREEMENT.
(2) A FRANCHISE AGREEMENT MAY NOT INCLUDE PROVISIONS THAT
WAIVE, AVOID, RESTRICT, OR LIMIT A MANUFACTURER’S COMPLIANCE WITH THIS
SUBTITLE.
(D) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A
MANUFACTURER OR A DEALER TO DISCLOSE THE IDENTITY OF EXISTING
CUSTOMERS OR CUSTOMER LISTS.
(E) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO ABROGATE A TELEMATICS
SERVICES CONTRACT OR OTHER CONTRACT THAT EXISTS BETWEEN A
MANUFACTURER OR SERVICE PROVIDER, AN OWNER, OR A DEALER.
14–5004.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, FOR MODEL
YEAR 2002 MOTOR VEHICLES AND EACH MODEL YEAR THEREAFTER AND MODEL
YEAR 2013 HEAVY–DUTY VEHICLES AND EACH MODEL YEAR THEREAFTER, A
MANUFACTURER SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE FOR PURCHASE BY OWNERS AND
INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITIES THE SAME DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR
INFORMATION THAT THE MANUFACTURER MAKES AVAILABLE TO THE
MANUFACTURER’S DEALERS THROUGH THE MANUFACTURER’S INTERNET–BASED
DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR INFORMATION SYSTEM OR OTHER ELECTRONICALLY
ACCESSIBLE MANUFACTURER’S REPAIR INFORMATION SYSTEM.
(B) ALL CONTENT IN A MANUFACTURER’S REPAIR INFORMATION SYSTEM
SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE TO OWNERS AND TO INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITIES
IN THE SAME FORM AND MANNER AND TO THE SAME EXTENT AS IT IS MADE
AVAILABLE TO DEALERS USING THE DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR INFORMATION
SYSTEM.

HOUSE BILL 843
(C) A MANUFACTURER SHALL ALLOW OWNERS AND INDEPENDENT REPAIR
FACILITIES TO PURCHASE THE MANUFACTURER’S DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR
INFORMATION:
(1) ON A DAILY, MONTHLY, OR YEARLY SUBSCRIPTION BASIS; AND
(2) ON FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
MANUFACTURER MAY NOT REQUIRE A DEALER TO PURCHASE DIAGNOSTIC,
SERVICE, OR REPAIR INFORMATION IN A PROPRIETARY FORMAT IF THE
MANUFACTURER SELLS DIAGNOSTIC, SERVICE, OR REPAIR INFORMATION TO AN
INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY OR OTHER THIRD–PARTY PROVIDER:
(I) IN A FORMAT THAT IS STANDARDIZED WITH OTHER
MANUFACTURERS; AND
(II) ON TERMS AND CONDITIONS MORE FAVORABLE THAN THE
MANNER AND THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS UNDER WHICH A DEALER OBTAINS THE
SAME DIAGNOSTIC, SERVICE, OR REPAIR INFORMATION.
(2) A MANUFACTURER MAY REQUIRE A DEALER TO PURCHASE
DIAGNOSTIC, SERVICE, OR REPAIR INFORMATION IN A PROPRIETARY FORMAT IF
THE PROPRIETARY FORMAT INCLUDES DIAGNOSTIC, SERVICE, REPAIR, OR
DEALERSHIP OPERATIONS INFORMATION OR FUNCTIONALITY THAT IS NOT
AVAILABLE IN THE STANDARDIZED FORMAT.
(E) (1) A MANUFACTURER MAY EXCLUDE DIAGNOSTIC, SERVICE, AND
REPAIR INFORMATION NECESSARY TO RESET AN IMMOBILIZER SYSTEM OR
SECURITY–RELATED ELECTRONIC MODULES FROM INFORMATION PROVIDED TO
OWNERS AND INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITIES.
(2) IF A MANUFACTURER EXCLUDES INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE
WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN OWNER OR INDEPENDENT REPAIR
FACILITY MAY OBTAIN THE INFORMATION THROUGH THE NATIONAL AUTOMOTIVE
SERVICE TASK FORCE OR OTHER RELIABLE AND ACCEPTED SYSTEM.
14–5005.
(A) (1) FOR MODEL YEAR 2002 MOTOR VEHICLES AND EACH MODEL YEAR
THEREAFTER AND MODEL YEAR 2013 HEAVY–DUTY VEHICLES AND EACH MODEL
YEAR THEREAFTER, A MANUFACTURER SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE FOR PURCHASE BY
OWNERS AND INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITIES ALL DIAGNOSTIC REPAIR TOOLS

HOUSE BILL 843 7
INCORPORATING THE SAME DIAGNOSTIC, REPAIR, AND WIRELESS CAPABILITIES
THAT THE MANUFACTURER MAKES AVAILABLE TO THE MANUFACTURER’S DEALERS.
(2) THE TOOLS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCORPORATE THE SAME FUNCTIONAL REPAIR CAPABILITIES THAT THE
MANUFACTURER MAKES AVAILABLE TO DEALERS.
(3) A MANUFACTURER SHALL OFFER THE TOOLS FOR SALE TO
OWNERS AND TO INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITIES ON FAIR AND REASONABLE
TERMS.
(B) (1) IF A MANUFACTURER SELLS DIAGNOSTIC TOOLS OR
INFORMATION NECESSARY TO DIAGNOSE, SERVICE, OR REPAIR A MOTOR VEHICLE
TO AN INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY ON TERMS THAT ARE MORE FAVORABLE
THAN THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS THAT ARE OFFERED TO A DEALER FOR THE SAME
DIAGNOSTIC TOOLS OR INFORMATION, THE MANUFACTURER SHALL OFFER THE
DIAGNOSTIC TOOLS OR INFORMATION TO THE DEALER IN THE SAME MANNER AND
ON THE SAME TERMS AND CONDITIONS AS PROVIDED TO THE INDEPENDENT REPAIR
FACILITY.
(2) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A MANUFACTURER MAY NOT REQUIRE A DEALER TO PURCHASE A
PROPRIETARY TOOL AND INTERFACE IF:
1. THE MANUFACTURER SELLS DIAGNOSTIC TOOLS
NECESSARY TO DIAGNOSE, SERVICE, OR REPAIR A MOTOR VEHICLE TO
INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITIES; AND
2. THE DIAGNOSTIC TOOL COMMUNICATES WITH THE
VEHICLE USING THE SAME NONPROPRIETARY INTERFACE USED BY OTHER
MANUFACTURERS.
(II) A MANUFACTURER MAY REQUIRE A DEALER TO PURCHASE
A PROPRIETARY TOOL AND INTERFACE IF THE PROPRIETARY INTERFACE HAS A
CAPABILITY THAT IS NOT AVAILABLE IN THE NONPROPRIETARY INTERFACE.
(C) (1) A MANUFACTURER SHALL PROVIDE DIAGNOSTIC REPAIR
INFORMATION TO AFTERMARKET SCAN TOOL COMPANIES AND THIRD–PARTY
SERVICE INFORMATION PROVIDERS WITH WHOM THE MANUFACTURER HAS A
LICENSING, CONTRACTUAL, OR CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENT FOR THE SOLE
PURPOSE OF BUILDING AFTERMARKET DIAGNOSTIC TOOLS AND THIRD–PARTY
SERVICE INFORMATION PUBLICATIONS AND SYSTEMS.

HOUSE BILL 843
(2) A MANUFACTURER THAT COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR THE CONTENT AND
FUNCTIONALITY OF AFTERMARKET DIAGNOSTIC TOOLS OR SERVICE INFORMATION
SYSTEMS.
14–5006.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A HEAVY–DUTY VEHICLE BUILT TO
CUSTOM SPECIFICATIONS SOLD FOR COMMERCIAL PURPOSES.
(B) BEGINNING IN MODEL YEAR 2018, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN §
14–5004(E) OF THIS SUBTITLE, A MANUFACTURER SHALL PROVIDE ACCESS TO:
(1) THE MANUFACTURER’S ONBOARD DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR
INFORMATION SYSTEM USING AN OFF–THE–SHELF PERSONAL COMPUTER WITH
SUFFICIENT MEMORY, PROCESSOR SPEED, CONNECTIVITY, AND OTHER
CAPABILITIES AS SPECIFIED BY THE VEHICLE MANUFACTURER; AND
(2) ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) A NONPROPRIETARY VEHICLE INTERFACE DEVICE THAT
COMPLIES WITH:
1. THE SOCIETY OF AUTOMOTIVE ENGINEERS
STANDARD J2534;
2. THE SOCIETY OF AUTOMOTIVE ENGINEERS
STANDARD J1939;
3. THE INTERNATIONAL ORGANIZATION FOR
STANDARDIZATION STANDARD 22900; OR
4. ANY SUCCESSOR TO THE STANDARDS LISTED IN
ITEMS 1 THROUGH 3 OF THIS ITEM AS ACCEPTED OR PUBLISHED BY THE SOCIETY
OF AUTOMOTIVE ENGINEERS OR THE INTERNATIONAL ORGANIZATION FOR
STANDARDIZATION;
(II) AN ONBOARD DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR INFORMATION
SYSTEM INTEGRATED AND ENTIRELY SELF–CONTAINED WITHIN THE VEHICLE,
INCLUDING SERVICE INFORMATION SYSTEMS INTEGRATED INTO AN ONBOARD
DISPLAY; OR

HOUSE BILL 843 9
(III) A SYSTEM THAT PROVIDES DIRECT ACCESS TO ONBOARD
DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR INFORMATION THROUGH A NONPROPRIETARY VEHICLE
INTERFACE, SUCH AS ETHERNET, UNIVERSAL SERIAL BUS, OR DIGITAL VERSATILE
DISC.
(C) A MANUFACTURER SHALL PROVIDE OWNERS AND INDEPENDENT
REPAIR FACILITIES WITH THE SAME ACCESS TO ONBOARD DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR
INFORMATION THAT IS AVAILABLE TO THE MANUFACTURER’S DEALERS, INCLUDING
TECHNICAL UPDATES TO THE ONBOARD SYSTEMS, THROUGH THE
NONPROPRIETARY VEHICLE INTERFACES UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2)(I) OF THIS
SECTION.
(D) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A DEALER TO USE
A NONPROPRIETARY VEHICLE INTERFACE SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION OR TO
PREVENT A MANUFACTURER FROM DEVELOPING A PROPRIETARY VEHICLE
DIAGNOSTIC AND REPROGRAMMING DEVICE IF THE MANUFACTURER:
(1) COMPLIES WITH THIS SECTION;
(2) MAKES THE DEVICE AVAILABLE TO OWNERS AND INDEPENDENT
REPAIR FACILITIES ON FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS; AND
(3) OTHERWISE COMPLIES WITH § 14–5004 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) A MANUFACTURER MAY NOT BE PROHIBITED FROM MAKING
PROPRIETARY TOOLS AVAILABLE TO DEALERS IF THE TOOLS ARE:
(1) FOR A SPECIFIC SPECIALIZED DIAGNOSTIC OR REPAIR
PROCEDURE DEVELOPED FOR THE SOLE PURPOSE OF A CUSTOMER SERVICE
CAMPAIGN MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS SET OUT IN 49 C.F.R. § 579.5; OR
(2) FOR THE PERFORMANCE OF A SPECIFIC TECHNICAL SERVICE
BULLETIN OR RECALL:
(I) AFTER THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS PRODUCED; AND
(II) WHERE THE ORIGINAL MOTOR VEHICLE DESIGN WAS NOT
ORIGINALLY INTENDED FOR DIRECT INTERFACE THROUGH A NONPROPRIETARY
INTERFACE SET OUT UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) IF A PROPRIETARY TOOL IS AVAILABLE TO THE AFTERMARKET ON FAIR
AND REASONABLE TERMS, PROVISION OF A PROPRIETARY TOOL UNDER THIS
SECTION IS NOT A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE EVEN IF THE TOOLS PROVIDE

HOUSE BILL 843
FUNCTIONS NOT AVAILABLE THROUGH A NONPROPRIETARY VEHICLE INTERFACE
SET FORTH UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION AUTHORIZES A MANUFACTURER TO
EXCLUSIVELY DEVELOP PROPRIETARY TOOLS, WITHOUT A NONPROPRIETARY
EQUIVALENT, FOR DIAGNOSTIC OR REPAIR PROCEDURES THAT FALL OUTSIDE THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION OR TO OTHERWISE OPERATE IN A MANNER
INCONSISTENT WITH SUBSECTION (B)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
14–5007.
(A) A MANUFACTURER THAT SELLS MOTOR VEHICLES EQUIPPED WITH A
TELEMATICS SYSTEM SHALL INSTALL AN OPEN DATA PLATFORM IN EACH MOTOR
VEHICLE WITH A TELEMATICS SYSTEM BEGINNING WITH MODEL YEAR 2025.
(B) A TELEMATICS SYSTEM INSTALLED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE:
(1) STANDARDIZED ACROSS ALL MAKES AND MODELS OF MOTOR
VEHICLES; AND
(2) INSTALLED BY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD–PARTY PROVIDER.
(C) AN OWNER SHALL BE ABLE TO:
(1) EASILY ACCESS THE INFORMATION IN THE TELEMATICS SYSTEM;
AND
(2) EASILY GIVE CONSENT TO AN INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY TO:
(I) ACCESS THE TELEMATICS INFORMATION; AND
(II) SEND COMMANDS TO THE MOTOR VEHICLE’S SYSTEM FOR
DIAGNOSTIC TESTING, REPAIR, OR MAINTENANCE.
14–5008.
(A) THE DIVISION SHALL DEVELOP A DOCUMENT THAT EXPLAINS:
(1) WHAT A TELEMATICS SYSTEM IS; AND
(2) AN OWNER’S RIGHTS RELATING TO:
(I) A TELEMATICS SYSTEM; AND

HOUSE BILL 843 11
(II) ACCESS TO INFORMATION AND TOOLS RELATING TO THE
OWNER’S MOTOR VEHICLE.
(B) A MOTOR VEHICLE DEALER SHALL GIVE A CONSUMER WHO BUYS A
MOTOR VEHICLE WITH A TELEMATICS SYSTEM THE DOCUMENT DEVELOPED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AT THE TIME OF THE PURCHASE OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE.
14–5009.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) AN INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY OR OWNER THAT BELIEVES
THAT A MANUFACTURER HAS FAILED TO PROVIDE INFORMATION OR A TOOL
REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE SHALL NOTIFY THE MANUFACTURER, IN WRITING,
THROUGH THE NATIONAL AUTOMOTIVE SERVICE TASK FORCE SERVICE
INFORMATION REQUEST PROCESS.
(2) IF A MANUFACTURER IS NOTIFIED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE MANUFACTURER MAY CURE THE
FAILURE WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE TIME THE MANUFACTURER RECEIVES THE
COMPLAINT TO CURE THE FAILURE.
(3) IF THE MANUFACTURER CURES THE FAILURE WITHIN THE CURE
PERIOD DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, DAMAGES SHALL BE
LIMITED TO ACTUAL DAMAGES IN ANY SUBSEQUENT LITIGATION IN ACCORDANCE
WITH TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) (1) IF A MANUFACTURER FAILS TO RESPOND TO THE NOTICE
PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, OR IF AN
OWNER OR INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY IS NOT SATISFIED WITH THE
MANUFACTURER’S CURE, THE INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY OR OWNER MAY
BRING AN ACTION AGAINST THE MANUFACTURER IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–408
OF THIS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 843
(2) A COMPLAINT FILED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) WRITTEN CONFIRMATION THAT THE OWNER OR
INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY VISITED THE MANUFACTURER’S WEBSITE AND
ATTEMPTED TO EFFECT A PROPER REPAIR USING INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THE
WEBSITE, INCLUDING COMMUNICATION WITH CUSTOMER ASSISTANCE THROUGH
THE MANUFACTURER’S TOLL–FREE CALL–IN ASSISTANCE, IF MADE AVAILABLE BY
THE MANUFACTURER;
(II) WRITTEN CONFIRMATION THAT THE OWNER OR
INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY OBTAINED AND USED THE RELEVANT
MANUFACTURER’S SCAN OR DIAGNOSTIC TOOL NECESSARY FOR THE REPAIR; AND
(III) EVIDENCE THAT THE MANUFACTURER WAS NOTIFIED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) A DEALER MAY EXERCISE THE RIGHTS AND REMEDIES PROVIDED IN
THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING EXERCISING THE RIGHTS AND REMEDIES AUTHORIZED
FOR AN INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.